Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.26.130

Principles of law and equity.

Title 62A RCW, consumer protection law, law governing deposits generally, law related to escheat and abandoned or unclaimed property, and the principles of law and equity, including law related to capacity to contract, principal and agent, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, and bankruptcy, supplement this chapter, except to the extent inconsistent with this chapter.

[ 2024 c 23 s 14.]